Washington statutes.
RCW 36.60.070

Power of eminent domain.

A county rail district may exercise the power of eminent domain to obtain property for its authorized purposes in the manner counties exercise the powers of eminent domain.

[ 1983 c 303 s 14.]

NOTES:

Eminent domain by counties: Chapter 8.08 RCW.